Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 4. Immediate Custody, Arrest, Detention and Shelter Care.
§ 16.1-249.1.
Places of confinement to give notice of intake of certain persons.

At the time of receipt of any person, for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1 into a secure facility, the secure facility shall obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police. A person required to register shall register and submit to be photographed as part of the registration. The facility shall forthwith forward the registration information to the Department of State Police on the date of the receipt of the prisoner.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the facility shall promptly investigate or request the State Police promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant, or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was received. The facility shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

History.

2006, cc. 857, 914.

§ 16.1-250.
Procedure for detention hearing.

When a child has been taken into immediate custody and not released as provided in §

16.1-247

or §

16.1-248.1

, such child shall appear before a judge on the next day on which the court sits within the county or city wherein the charge against the child is pending. In the event the court does not sit within the county or city on the following day, such child shall appear before a judge within a reasonable time, not to exceed 72 hours, after he has been taken into custody. If the 72-hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday or other legal holiday, the 72 hours shall be extended to the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. In the event the court does not sit on the following day within the county or city wherein the charge against the child is pending, the court may conduct the hearing in another county or city, but only if two-way electronic video and audio communication is available in the courthouse of the county or city wherein the charge is pending.

The appearance of the child, the attorney for the Commonwealth, the attorney for the child and the parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis may be by (i) personal appearance before the judge or (ii) use of two-way electronic video and audio communication. If two-way electronic video and audio communication is used, a judge may exercise all powers conferred by law and all communications and proceedings shall be conducted in the same manner as if the appearance were in person, and any documents filed may be transmitted by electronically transmitted facsimile process. The facsimile may be served or executed by the officer or person to whom sent, and returned in the same manner, and with the same force, effect, authority, and liability as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used for an appearance shall meet the standards as set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

Notice of the detention hearing or any rehearing, either oral or written, stating the time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given to the parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis if he can be found, to the child’s attorney, to the child if 12 years of age or older and to the attorney for the Commonwealth.

During the detention hearing, the parties shall be informed of the child’s right to remain silent with respect to any allegation of delinquency and of the contents of the petition. The attorney for the child and the attorney for the Commonwealth shall be given the opportunity to be heard.

If the judge finds that there is not probable cause to believe that the child committed the delinquent act alleged, the court shall order his release. If the judge finds that there is probable cause to believe that the child committed the delinquent act alleged but that the full-time detention of a child who is alleged to be delinquent is not required, the court shall order his release, and in so doing, the court may impose one or more of the following conditions singly or in combination:

Place the child in the custody of a parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis under their supervision, or under the supervision of an organization or individual agreeing to supervise him;

Place restrictions on the child’s travel, association or place of abode during the period of his release;

Impose any other condition deemed reasonably necessary and consistent with the criteria for detaining children specified in §

16.1-248.1

; or

Release the child on bail or recognizance in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2.

An order releasing a child on any of the conditions specified in this section may, at any time, be amended to impose additional or different conditions of release or to return the child who is alleged to be delinquent to custody for failure to conform to the conditions previously imposed.

All relevant and material evidence helpful in determining probable cause under this section or the need for detention may be admitted by the court even though not competent in a hearing on the petition.

If the child is not released and a parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis is not notified and does not appear or does not waive appearance at the hearing, upon the written request of such person stating that such person is willing and available to supervise the child upon release from detention and to return the child to court for all scheduled proceedings on the pending charges, the court shall rehear the matter on the next day on which the court sits within the county or city wherein the charge against the child is pending. If the court does not sit within the county or city on the following day, such hearing shall be held before a judge within a reasonable time, not to exceed 72 hours, after the request.

In considering probable cause under this section, if the court deems it necessary to summon witnesses to assist in such determination then the hearing may be continued and the child remain in detention, but in no event longer than three consecutive days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 338; 1985, c. 260; 1986, c. 542; 1988, c. 220; 1989, c. 549; 1992, c. 508; 1995, c. 451; 2004, c. 437; 2006, c. 89.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 437, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection C, inserted “or any rehearing” and “to the child’s attorney” and substituted “older” for “over”; in subsection D, combined the former first and second sentences into the first sentence, by deleting “judge shall advise the parties of the right to counsel pursuant to §

16.1-266

. The” and inserted “child and the attorney for the” in the last sentence; in subsection H, in the first sentence, inserted “written” and “stating that such person . . . on the pending charges”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 89 added the last sentence in subsection A; and inserted “the attorney for the Commonwealth, the attorney for the child and the parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis” in the first sentence of subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Venue for juvenile detention hearing. —

The proper venue for a juvenile detention hearing is the place where the proceeding has been commenced. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Michael W. Lee, Commonwealth’s Attorney for the City of Colonial Heights, 05-002 (3/29/05).

§ 16.1-250.1.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 437, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2005.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 837 inserted “If the seventy-two hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the seventy-two hours shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed” as the second sentence in the second paragraph.

§ 16.1-251.
Emergency removal order.

A child may be taken into immediate custody and placed in shelter care pursuant to an emergency removal order in cases in which the child is alleged to have been abused or neglected. Such order may be issued ex parte by the court upon a petition supported by an affidavit or by sworn testimony in person before the judge or intake officer which establishes that:

The child would be subjected to an imminent threat to life or health to the extent that severe or irremediable injury would be likely to result if the child were returned to or left in the custody of his parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis pending a final hearing on the petition.

Reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal of the child from his home and there are no alternatives less drastic than removal of the child from his home which could reasonably protect the child’s life or health pending a final hearing on the petition. The alternatives less drastic than removal may include but not be limited to the provision of medical, educational, psychiatric, psychological, homemaking or other similar services to the child or family or the issuance of a preliminary protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253

.If the petitioner fails to obtain an emergency removal order within four hours of taking custody of the child, the affidavit or sworn testimony before the judge or intake officer shall state the reasons therefor.When a child is removed from his home and there is no reasonable opportunity to provide preventive services, reasonable efforts to prevent removal shall be deemed to have been made.The petitioner shall not be required by the court to make reasonable efforts to prevent removal of the child from his home if the court finds that (i) the residual parental rights of the parent regarding a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated; (ii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred, or the other parent of the child; (iii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense; or (iv) on the basis of clear and convincing evidence, the parent has subjected any child to aggravated circumstances or abandoned a child under circumstances that would justify the termination of residual parental rights pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-283

.As used in this section:“Aggravated circumstances” means torture, chronic or severe abuse, or chronic or severe sexual abuse, if the victim of such conduct was a child of the parent or child with whom the parent resided at the time such conduct occurred, including the failure to protect such a child from such conduct, which conduct or failure to protect (i) evinces a wanton or depraved indifference to human life or (ii) has resulted in the death of such a child or in serious bodily injury to such a child.“Chronic abuse” or “chronic sexual abuse” means recurring acts of physical abuse that place the child’s health, safety and well-being at risk.“Serious bodily injury” means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.“Severe abuse” or “severe sexual abuse” may include an act or omission that occurred only once but otherwise meets the definition of “aggravated circumstances.”

Whenever a child is taken into immediate custody pursuant to an emergency removal order, a hearing shall be held in accordance with §

16.1-252

as soon as practicable, but in no event later than five business days after the removal of the child.

In the emergency removal order the court shall give consideration to temporary placement of the child with a person with a legitimate interest under the supervision of the local department of social services, until such time as the hearing in accordance with §

16.1-252

is held.

The local department of social services having “legal custody” of a child as defined in § 16.1-228 (i) shall not be required to comply with the requirements of this section in order to redetermine where and with whom the child shall live, notwithstanding that the child had been placed with a natural parent.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1984, c. 499; 1985, c. 584; 1986, c. 308; 1990, c. 769; 2000, c. 385; 2003, c. 508; 2017, c. 190; 2019, c. 434.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, placement of child, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

As to permanent foster care placements, see §

63.2-908

.

As to testimony of child by use of two-way closed-circuit television in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1521

. As to admission of out-of-court statements made by certain children in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1522

. As to use of videotaped statements of certain children who are complaining witnesses in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1523

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385, in subsection C, substituted “a relative or other interested individual” for “suitable relatives” and inserted “under the supervision of the local department of social services”; and substituted “The local department of social services” for “A person” in subsection D.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 508 added the next-to-last paragraph in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 190 added the fourth paragraph and the definitions at the end of subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434 substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual, including grandparents” in subsection C.

Law Review.

For comment, “The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

For article, “Family Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).

§ 16.1-252.
Preliminary removal order; hearing.

A preliminary removal order in cases in which a child is alleged to have been abused or neglected may be issued by the court after a hearing wherein the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal of the child from his home. The hearing shall be in the nature of a preliminary hearing rather than a final determination of custody.

Prior to the removal hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given at least 24 hours in advance of the hearing to the guardian ad litem for the child, to the parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis of the child and to the child if he or she is 12 years of age or older. If notice to the parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis cannot be given despite diligent efforts to do so, the hearing shall be held nonetheless, and the parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis shall be afforded a later hearing on their motion regarding a continuation of the summary removal order. The notice provided herein shall include (i) the time, date and place for the hearing; (ii) a specific statement of the factual circumstances which allegedly necessitate removal of the child; and (iii) notice that child support will be considered if a determination is made that the child must be removed from the home.

All parties to the hearing shall be informed of their right to counsel pursuant to §

16.1-266

.

At the removal hearing the child and his parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis shall have the right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses and evidence and to present evidence on their own behalf. If the child was 14 years of age or under on the date of the alleged offense and is 16 or under at the time of the hearing, the child’s attorney or guardian ad litem, or if the child has been committed to the custody of the Department of Social Services, the local department of social services, may apply for an order from the court that the child’s testimony be taken in a room outside the courtroom and be televised by two-way closed-circuit television. The provisions of §

63.2-1521

shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to the use of two-way closed-circuit television except that the person seeking the order shall apply for the order at least 48 hours before the hearing, unless the court for good cause shown allows the application to be made at a later time.

In order for a preliminary order to issue or for an existing order to be continued, the petitioning party or agency must prove:

The child would be subjected to an imminent threat to life or health to the extent that severe or irremediable injury would be likely to result if the child were returned to or left in the custody of his parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis pending a final hearing on the petition; and

Reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal of the child from his home and there are no alternatives less drastic than removal of the child from his home which could reasonably and adequately protect the child’s life or health pending a final hearing on the petition. The alternatives less drastic than removal may include but not be limited to the provision of medical, educational, psychiatric, psychological, homemaking or other similar services to the child or family or the issuance of a preliminary protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253

.When a child is removed from his home and there is no reasonable opportunity to provide preventive services, reasonable efforts to prevent removal shall be deemed to have been made.The petitioner shall not be required by the court to make reasonable efforts to prevent removal of the child from his home if the court finds that (i) the residual parental rights of the parent regarding a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated; (ii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred, or the other parent of the child; (iii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense; or (iv) on the basis of clear and convincing evidence, the parent has subjected any child to aggravated circumstances, or abandoned a child under circumstances that would justify the termination of residual parental rights pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-283

.As used in this section:“Aggravated circumstances” means torture, chronic or severe abuse, or chronic or severe sexual abuse, if the victim of such conduct was a child of the parent or child with whom the parent resided at the time such conduct occurred, including the failure to protect such a child from such conduct, which conduct or failure to protect (i) evinces a wanton or depraved indifference to human life or (ii) has resulted in the death of such a child or in serious bodily injury to such a child.“Chronic abuse” or “chronic sexual abuse” means recurring acts of physical abuse that place the child’s health, safety and well-being at risk.“Serious bodily injury” means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.“Severe abuse” or “severe sexual abuse” may include an act or omission that occurred only once but otherwise meets the definition of “aggravated circumstances.”

If the court determines that pursuant to subsection E hereof the removal of the child is proper, the court shall:

Order that the child be placed in the temporary care and custody of a suitable person, subject to the provisions of subsection F1 and under the supervision of the local department of social services, with consideration being given to placement in the temporary care and custody of a person with a legitimate interest until such time as the court enters an order of disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

, or, if such placement is not available, in the care and custody of a suitable agency;

Order that reasonable visitation be allowed between the child and his parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis, and between the child and his siblings, if such visitation would not endanger the child’s life or health; and

Order that the parent or other legally obligated person pay child support pursuant to §

16.1-290

.In addition, the court may enter a preliminary protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253

imposing requirements and conditions as specified in that section which the court deems appropriate for protection of the welfare of the child.

At the conclusion of the preliminary removal order hearing, the court shall determine whether the allegations of abuse or neglect have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence. Any finding of abuse or neglect shall be stated in the court order. However, if, before such a finding is made, a person responsible for the care and custody of the child, the child’s guardian ad litem or the local department of social services objects to a finding being made at the hearing, the court shall schedule an adjudicatory hearing to be held within 30 days of the date of the initial preliminary removal hearing. The adjudicatory hearing shall be held to determine whether the allegations of abuse and neglect have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence. Parties who are present at the preliminary removal order hearing shall be given notice of the date set for the adjudicatory hearing and parties who are not present shall be summoned as provided in §

16.1-263

. The hearing shall be held and an order may be entered, although a party to the preliminary removal order hearing fails to appear and is not represented by counsel, provided personal or substituted service was made on the person, or the court determines that such person cannot be found, after reasonable effort, or in the case of a person who is without the Commonwealth, the person cannot be found or his post office address cannot be ascertained after reasonable effort.The preliminary removal order and any preliminary protective order issued shall remain in full force and effect pending the adjudicatory hearing.

If the preliminary removal order includes a finding of abuse or neglect and the child is removed from his home or a preliminary protective order is issued, a dispositional hearing shall be held pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

. The dispositional hearing shall be scheduled at the time of the preliminary removal order hearing and shall be held within 60 days of the preliminary removal order hearing. If an adjudicatory hearing is requested pursuant to subsection G, the dispositional hearing shall nonetheless be scheduled at the initial preliminary removal order hearing. All parties present at the preliminary removal order hearing shall be given notice of the date scheduled for the dispositional hearing; parties who are not present shall be summoned to appear as provided in §

16.1-263

.

The local department of social services having “legal custody” of a child as defined in § 16.1-228 (i) shall not be required to comply with the requirements of this section in order to redetermine where and with whom the child shall live, notwithstanding that the child had been placed with a natural parent.

Violation of any order issued pursuant to this section shall constitute contempt of court.

F1.

Prior to the entry of an order pursuant to subsection F transferring temporary custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest, the court shall consider whether such person is one who (i) is willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; and (iii) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect. The court’s order transferring temporary custody to a person with a legitimate interest should provide for compliance with any preliminary protective order entered on behalf of the child in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-253

; initiation and completion of the investigation as directed by the court and court review of the child’s placement required in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-278.2

; and, as appropriate, ongoing provision of social services to the child and the temporary custodian.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1984, c. 499; 1985, c. 584; 1986, c. 308; 1990, c. 769; 1994, c. 42; 1995, c. 817; 1997, c. 790; 1999, c. 668; 2000, c. 385; 2008, c. 397; 2013, c. 130; 2017, c. 190; 2019, c. 434.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

As to admission of out-of-court statements made by certain children in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1522

. As to use of videotaped statements of certain children who are complaining witnesses in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1523

.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection D, in the second sentence, substituted “was fourteen years of age” for “is twelve years of age” and inserted “on the date of the alleged offense and is sixteen or under at the time of the hearing.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385, in subdivision F 1, inserted “temporary” preceding “care” twice, inserted “subject to the provisions of subsection F1 of this section and under the supervision of the local department of social services,” and substituted “relative or other interested individual, including grandparents, until such time as the court enters an order of disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

” for “nearest kin, including grandparents, or personal friend”; added subsection F1; and substituted “The local department of social services” for “A person” in subsection I.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 397 inserted “and between the child and his siblings” in subdivision F 2.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “60 days” for “seventy-five days” in the second sentence of subsection H, and made numeric stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 190 added the third paragraph and the definitions at the end of subdivision E 2.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434, in subdivision F 1, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual, including grandparents”; in subsection F1, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for both “relative or other interested individual, including grandparents” and “relative or other interested individual,” and substituted “such person” for “the relative or other interested individual”; and made stylistic changes.